test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-ngesosj_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - ӈэсось: # Verb 'to camp' /Type 9/ - partial paradigm

     ӈэсось+V+IV+ConNeg: ӈэсуˮ
     ӈэсось+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu1: ӈэсоданиʼ
     ӈэсось+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu2: ӈэсодадиʼ
     ӈэсось+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: ӈэсодахуʼ
     ӈэсось+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl1: ӈэсодаваˮ
     ӈэсось+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl2: ӈэсодадаˮ
     ӈэсось+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: ӈэсодаˮ 
     ӈэсось+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg1: ӈэсодадмʼ
     ӈэсось+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg2: ӈэсодан
     ӈэсось+V+IV+Fut+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: ӈэсода
     ӈэсось+V+IV+GerFin: ӈэсованзь
     ӈэсось+V+IV+Ger: [ӈэсо, ӈэсось]
     ӈэсось+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScDu1: ӈэсыниʼ
     ӈэсось+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScDu2: ӈэсыдиʼ
     ӈэсось+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: ӈэсыхиʼ
     ӈэсось+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScPl1: ӈэсываˮ
     ӈэсось+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScPl2: ӈэсыдаˮ
     ӈэсось+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: ӈэсыˮ
     ӈэсось+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScSg1: ӈэсыдмʼ
     ӈэсось+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScSg2: ӈэсын
     ӈэсось+V+IV+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: ӈэсы
     ӈэсось+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1: ӈэсынинзь
     ӈэсось+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2: ӈэсыдинзь
     ӈэсось+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: ӈэсыхинзь
     ӈэсось+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1: ӈэсываць
     ӈэсось+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2: ӈэсыдаць
     ӈэсось+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: ӈэсыць
     ӈэсось+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1: ӈэсыдамзь
     ӈэсось+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2: ӈэсынась
     ӈэсось+V+IV+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: ӈэсысь
     ӈэсось+V+IV+InfImprf: ӈэсова
     ӈэсось+V+IV+InfPrf: ӈэсоˮма
     ӈэсось+V+IV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScDu1: ӈэсовэниʼ
     ӈэсось+V+IV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScDu2: ӈэсовэдиʼ
     ӈэсось+V+IV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScDu3: ӈэсовэхэʼ
     ӈэсось+V+IV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScPl1: ӈэсовэваˮ
     ӈэсось+V+IV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScPl2: ӈэсовэдаˮ
     ӈэсось+V+IV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScPl3: ӈэсовыˮ
     ӈэсось+V+IV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScSg1: ӈэсовэдмʼ
     ӈэсось+V+IV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScSg2: ӈэсовэн
     ӈэсось+V+IV+Mod/narr+Aor+ScSg3: ӈэсовы
     ӈэсось+V+IV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScDu1: ӈэсовэнинзь
     ӈэсось+V+IV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScDu2: ӈэсовэдинзь
     ӈэсось+V+IV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScDu3: ӈэсовэхэнзь
     ӈэсось+V+IV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScPl1: ӈэсовэваць
     ӈэсось+V+IV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScPl2: ӈэсовэдаць
     ӈэсось+V+IV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScPl3: [ӈэсовыць, ӈэсовэць]
     ӈэсось+V+IV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScSg1: ӈэсовэдамзь
     ӈэсось+V+IV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScSg2: ӈэсовэнась
     ӈэсось+V+IV+Mod/narr+Prt1+ScSg3: [ӈэсовысь, ӈэсовэсь]
     ӈэсось+V+IV+PrcFut: [ӈэсованда, ӈэсовнда]
     ӈэсось+V+IV+PrcImprf: ӈэсода
     ӈэсось+V+IV+PrcNeg: ӈэсовдавэй
     ӈэсось+V+IV+PrcPrf: ӈэсовы
